norwegian.lexc
!! Below is the 'ville' beginning for the verbs. The rest of the flags are OFF. !!
LEXICON villeBegynnelse

@U.VILLE.ON@@D.Å@@D.HAR@@D.HADDE@@D.VIL@@D.VIL_HA@@D.VILLE_HA@@D.DU@            #;

!! Below is the 'ville_ha' beginning for the verbs. The rest of the flags are OFF. !!
LEXICON ville_haBegynnelse

@U.VILLE_HA.ON@@D.Å@@D.HAR@@D.HADDE@@D.VIL@@D.VIL_HA@@D.VILLE@@D.DU@            #;

!! Below is the 'du' beginning for the verbs (the pronoun 'you'). The rest of the flags are OFF. !!
LEXICON duBegynnelse

@U.DU.ON@@D.Å@@D.HAR@@D.HADDE@@D.VIL@@D.VIL_HA@@D.VILLE@@D.VILLE_HA@            #;


!! Below is the masculine conjugation for regular nouns. !!
LEXICON SubsInfHankjønns
+S+Sg+Ubes:0        #;
+S+Sg+Bes:+en       #;
+S+Pl+Ubes:+er      #;
+S+Pl+Bes:+ene      #;


!! Below is the feminine conjugation for regular nouns. !!
LEXICON SubsInfHunkjønns
+S+Sg+Ubes:0        #;
+S+Sg+Bes:+a        #;
+S+Pl+Ubes:+er      #;
+S+Pl+Bes:+ene      #;

!! Below is the neuter conjugation for regular nouns. !!
LEXICON SubsInfIntetkjønn
+S+Sg+Ubes:0        #;
+S+Sg+Bes:+et       #;
+S+Pl+Ubes:+er      #;
+S+Pl+Bes:+ene      #;

!! Below is the neuter conjugation for irregular or strong nouns. !!
LEXICON SubsInfIntetkjønnSterke
+S+Sg+Ubes:0        #;
+S+Sg+Bes:+et       #;
+S+Pl+Ubes:+ær      #;
+S+Pl+Bes:+ærne     #;

!! Below is two suffixes for some of the nouns. They are masculine so they lead to the masculine conjugation. !!
!! The bare nouns also go to the conjugation to be inflected on their own (i.e., kirke) as well as with the suffix (i.e., kirkegjenger). !!
LEXICON Suffiks
@R.GJENGER@+gjenger:@R.GJENGER@+gjenger           SubsInfHankjønns;
@R.TAKER@+taker:@R.TAKER@+taker                   SubsInfHankjønns;
                                                  SubsInfHankjønns;
